Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.190

Certain contributions required to be by written instrument. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) A person may not make a contribution of more than *one hundred dollars, other than an in-kind contribution, except by a written instrument containing the name of the donor and the name of the payee.

(2) A political committee may not make a contribution, other than in-kind, except by a written instrument containing the name of the donor and the name of the payee.

[ 2024 c 164 s 461; 2019 c 428 s 28; 2010 c 204 s 611; 1995 c 397 s 23; 1993 c 2 s 14 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.475, 42.17.740.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The dollar amounts in this section may have been adjusted for inflation by rule of the commission adopted under the authority of RCW 29B.20.050. For current dollar amounts, see WAC 390-05-400.

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—1995 c 397: See note following RCW 29B.40.020.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.